Tables/Contraction/en-us-g2.ctb
# the letter e
always e 15
always E 15
always e'en 15-3-26 Hallowe'en
midword ea 2
midword eabil = interchangeability
always eable 15-1-3456
endword eably = noticeably
midendword eage = mileage
sufword eagle = eaglenose
sufword eagled 15-1-1245-123-1246
midendword eager 2-1245-12456 meager
always eally 15-6-13456
midendword eance 15-46-15 vengeance
midendword eand 15-12346 meander
always eation 15-6-1345
always ear 15-345
sufword hideaw = hideaway
always ed 1246
sufword edacious 15-145-1-14-24-1256-234 edaciousness
always edic = edict Benedict
sufword edition 15-145-24-56-1345 editions
midword edo 15-145-135
midendword edown 15-145-246-1345 facedown
sufword torpedo 2345-135-1235-1234-1246-135
sufword tuxedo 2345-136-1346-1246-135
always edraw =
always eever 15-15-1236-12456 Cheever
word either 15-24
contraction ei
word en =
always en 26
always ename 15-5-1345
sufword enamel 26-1-134-15-123 enameled
midendword ence 56-15
always enceph 26-14-15-1234-125 electroencephalogram
begword encyclopedi 26-14-13456-14-123-135-1234-1246-24 encyclopedic
sufword endow 26-145-246
always eneck = bottleneck
midendword eness 15-56-234 closeness
begword enor = enormous
begword enou 15-1345-1256
lowword enough 26
word enough 26-1256-126
sufword enough\s-\s 26-1256-126-36-36
midendword entiment 26-2345-24-56-2345 sentimental
begword enu 15-1345-136
begword equino = equinox
always er 12456
begword era =
word eras 12456-1-234
begword erec = erect 
begword ero 15-1235-135
begword erog 12456-135-1245 erogenous
word eros 12456-135-234 Down Eros, up Mars!
sufword erotic 12456-135-2345-24-14
midendword eroom = storeroom
begword eru = erupt
begword erudi 12456-136-145-24 erudite
midendword onesque = Runyonesques
word ethereally 15-2346-1235-15-6-13456
always ever 5-15
sufword eversion 15-1236-12456-46-1345 eversions
sufword evert 15-1236-12456-2345 everted
word every 15
sufword eyedrop = eyedropper

# the letter f
always f 124
always F 124
sufword falcon = falconer
sufword fandom =
midword ff 235
always father 5-124
sufword fed 124-1246 fedora
always fein 124-15-35 Feingold
always first 124-34
word fst =
always fever 124-15-1236-12456
always ffor 124-123456
sufword fiance =
largesign for 123456
always fore 123456-15
begword forens 123456-26-234 forensic
always forever 123456-5-15 forevermore
always foot =
sufword forbes 123456-12-15-234 Forbestown
word from 124
before vowel always friend 124-1235-24-26-145
always friend 124-1235
contraction fr
word fruity =
midendword ful 56-123
endword full =
always funder 124-136-1345-145-12456

# the letter g
always g 1245
always G 1245
word gainsaid 1245-1-35-234-145
begword genealog 1245-26-15-1-123-135-1245 genealogy
begword geo = geoengineering
sufword geoff 1245-15-12356-124 Geoffrey
midword gg 2356
always gh 126
endword ngham = Langham
always ghead 1245-125-2-145
always gheart 1245-125-15-345-2345
midendword ghill = dunghill
midendword ghof 1245-125-12356 Berghoffer
midendword ghorn = bighorn
always ghouse 1245-125-1256-234-15
always ghz = (gigahertz)
sufword gingold 1245-35-1245-135-123-145
begword givea = giveaway
sufword gnome = gnomedb
word go 1245
begword goath = goatherd
sufword goddaughter 1245-135-145-145-1-136-126-2345-12456
sufword goddess 1245-135-256-15-234-234 goddessship
sufword good 1245-145
contraction gd
sufword goshawk =
sufword gosherd 1245-135-234-125-12456-145
midendword ingrad 35-1245-1235-1-145 Leningrad, Stalingrad
begword grapea = grapeade
begword gravedi = gravedigger
begword gravero = graverobbing
always great 1245-1235-2345
contraction grt
sufword guantanamera 1245-136-1-1345-2345-1-1345-1-134-12456-1
sufword guess = guesstimate
sufword guenever 1245-136-26-15-1236-12456 Guenevere
sufword guinever 1245-136-35-15-1236-12456 Guinevere

# the letter h
always h 125
always H 125
always had 456-125
begword hadd 125-1-256 haddock
sufword hade = hadean
sufword handsome 125-12346-5-234 handsomer
sufword hadr = hadrian 
word have 125
always headd 125-2-145-145 headdress
sufword headmistress 125-2-145-134-24-34-1235-15-234-234 headmistressship
sufword hedgerow 125-1246-1245-15-1235-246 hedgerow's
always here 5-125
word hereafter 5-125-1-124
sufword hereford 125-12456-15-123456-145
word hereinafter 5-125-35-1-124
always hered 125-12456-1246
always heren 125-12456-26
midendword herence 125-12456-56-15 adherence
always herer 125-12456-12456
begword heres 125-12456-15-234 heresy
always heret 125-12456-15-2345
word hereto 5-125-2345-135
word heretofore 5-125-2345-135-123456-15
word herself 125-12456-124
word herf =
word him 125-134
contraction hm
sufword hmm =
word himself 125-134-124
contraction hmf
lowword his 236
sufword his\s-\s 125-24-234-36-36
word holloware 125-135-123-123-135-2456-345-15
sufword horse = horseradish
word horsed 125-135-1235-234-1246
sufword horser 125-135-1235-234-12456 nine-horsers
begword horsera = horserace
sufword houghton 125-1256-126-2345-135-1345
begword housedres 125-1256-234-15-145-1235-15-234 housedressed
sufword humidistat 125-136-134-24-145-24-34-1-2345
always hydro =
begword hypsomet = hypsometrical

# the letter i
word i 24
always i 24
always I 24
word ibuprofen 24-12-136-1234-1235-12356-26
midendword iever 24-15-1236-12456
always immediate 24-134-134
contraction imm
begword immuno = immunofluorescence
lowword in 35
word in =
always in 35
sufword in\s-\s 24-1345-36-36
begword incon 35-14-135-1345 incongruous
begword indis 35-145-24-234 indistinct
begword inera 35-15-1235-1 ineradicable, inerasable, inerasible
begword iness 35-15-234-234 inessential, inessive
always iness 24-56-234
word ing 346 such as after a hyphen
midendword ing 346
midword ingal 35-1245-1-123 farthingale martingale nightingale
always ingar 35-1245-345 Weingarten
sufword ingham 35-1245-125-1-134
midendword ingism 35-1245-24-234-134 meningism
midword ingit 35-1245-24-2345 meningitis
midendword ingite 346-24-2345-15 wyomingite
begword ingle 35-1245-123-15 inglenook
sufword isinglass 24-234-35-1245-123-1-234-234
joinword into 35-235
sufword iou =
begword irrevers 24-1235-1235-15-1236-12456-234 irreversible
always isomer 24-234-135-134-12456
word it 1346
word its 1346-234
contraction xs
word itself 1346-124
contraction xf
midendword ity 56-13456

# the letter j
always j 245
always J 245
sufword jihad = jihadis
always jone 245-5-135 jonesing Jonette
word just 245
begword jungleri 245-136-1345-1245-123-15-1235-24 jungleridden

# the letter k
always k 13
always K 13
sufword kettledrum =
sufword kinross 13-35-1235-135-234-234 Kinrossshire
word kneedeep =
always know 5-13
sufword knownothing 5-13-1345-135-1456-346 knownothingism
word knowledge 13
sufword knuckledust 13-1345-136-14-13-123-15-145-136-34 knuckleduster knuckledusting
sufword kurdistan 13-136-1235-145-24-34-1-1345 Kurdistani

# the letter l
always l 123
always L 123
sufword lameduck =
begword leatherett 123-2-2346-1235-15-2345-2345 leatherette
midendword less 46-234
always lesson = unlessoned
always letter 123-1235
contraction lr
word like 123
begword limea = limeade
word lingerie 123-35-1245-12456-24-15
word lionel =
sufword little 123-123
contraction ll
always lord 5-123
begword lordos = lordosis lordoses
sufword lordotic =
sufword lucknow 123-136-14-13-1345-246

# the letter m
always m 134
always M 134
begword maha = maharaja, maharani
sufword mahoney = 
sufword mailorder 134-1-24-123-135-1235-145-12456
begword maneat 134-1-1345-15-1-2345 maneater, maneating
always many 456-134
begword mc =
always medic 134-1246-24-14 medicare
begword menager 134-26-1-1245-12456 menagery menageries
midendword ment 56-2345
midword menth 134-26-1456 Blumenthal
always mention 134-26-56-1345
sufword merioneth 134-12456-24-135-1345-15-1456 Merionethshire
sufword messagerie =
sufword midafternoon 134-24-145-1-124-1345
sufword middorsal =
always mideast 134-24-145-15-1-34
begword midwifer = midwifery
sufword milliner 134-24-123-123-35-12456
word milling 134-24-123-123-346
sufword mishallow 134-24-234-125-1-123-123-246
begword mishand 134-24-234-125-12346 mishandled
always mishap =
sufword mishear 134-24-234-125-15-345 misheard
sufword mishit =
begword missh 134-24-234-146 misshapen
sufword misshood =
always mistak = mistake
word mistook =
sufword mistrain 134-24-234-2345-1235-1-35 mistrained
begword mistran = mistranslation
sufword mistreat 134-24-234-2345-1235-2-2345
sufword mistrial = mistrials
begword mistru = mistrust
begword misty = mistyped
word monetary 134-5-135-2345-345-13456
word mongeese =
sufword mongoose =
sufword monteverdi 134-135-1345-2345-15-1236-12456-145-24 Monteverdi's
word more 134
word more'n 134-135-1235-15-3-1345
word more's =
always mother 5-134
always much 134-16
word mch =
sufword mucha 134-136-16-1 muchacho muchas
sufword mucho 134-136-16-135
word must 134-34
word mst =
begword musti 134-34-24 mustiness
word mustn 134-34-1345 mustn't
word musty 134-34-13456
begword myo = myofibroblasts
word myself 134-13456-124
contraction myf

# the letter n
always n 1345
always N 1345
always name 5-1345
always namee = McNamee
always nament 1345-1-56-2345 tournament
always namese =
endnum nd = (second)
always necessary 1345-15-14
contraction nec
word neither 1345-15-24
contraction nei
begword neof = neofascist
midendword ness 56-234
sufword nevers 1345-15-1236-12456-234 Louis Nevers
begword new =
begword news = newshawk
always nighth 1345-24-126-2345-125 nighthawk knighthood
begword non =
word none 1345-5-135
word nones 1345-5-135-234
word nonesuch 1345-5-135-234-16
word nonetheless 1345-5-135-2346-46-234
begword nonrevers 1345-135-1245-1235-15-1236-12456-234 nonreversible
word noone 1345-135-5-135
begword nosediv = nosedive
word not 1345
word noways =
sufword nowhere 1345-135-5-156
word nowise =
begword nuth 1345-136-2345-125 nuthatch nuthouse
word nuther 1345-136-2346-1235 (dialect)

# the letter o
word o 135
always o 135
always O 135
begword oe = Oedipus
midword oed = Schroeder
always oen = Phoenix
largesign of 12356
midendword ofar 135-124-345 insofar
always ofold = twofold
midword ofor 135-123456 thermoform
word oleaginous 135-123-15-1-1245-35-1256-234
sufword onegin 135-1345-15-1245-35 Eugene Onegin's grandfather
always onesi = Indonesia
sufword onesie 5-135-234-24-15 (baby clothing)
midendword oness 135-56-234
midendword oneer 135-1345-15-12456 pioneer
midendword oned 135-1345-1246 honed
always one 5-135
always aione = zabaione
midendword mione = Hermione
sufword oneiric =
always onent 135-1345-26-2345
midendword oneous 135-1345-15-1256-234 erroneous
always oner 135-1345-12456
midendword onese = Cantonese
word oneself 5-135-124
word onef =
midendword oness 135-56-234 Deaconess
midendword onet = phonetics bayonet
endword oneth 135-1345-15-1456 fashioneth
endword onez = Ordonez
midendword ong 56-1245
midendword ongen 135-1345-1245-26 uncongenial
midword ooen 135-135-26 constitooency (dialect: Buchan)
always oon = sooner
begword orangea = orangeade
begword oranger = orangery, -ies
begword orthopedi 135-1235-1456-135-1234-1246-24 orthopedics
word ou =
always ou 1256
midendword ound 46-145
midendword ount 46-2345
always ourselves 1256-1235-1236-234
word ourvs =
word out 1256
begword outdist 1256-2345-145-24-234-2345 outdistance
always ought 5-1256
begword outh 1256-2345-125 outheld
begword overea 135-1236-12456-15-1 overeat overeager overeasy
begword overear 135-1236-12456-15-345 overearnest
always ow 246
word o'clock 135-3-14
